New Jersey, session 221, A4111.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In the event that an eligible student borrower under the NJCLASS Loan Program becomes a parent, the authority shall grant a deferment of payment of loan principal and interest for a period of 12 weeks.  To qualify for the loan deferment, the student borrower shall provide the authority with proof of the childs birth or adoption within 120 days of the birth or adoption.  The deferment shall begin on the date that the student borrower's proof of the childs birth or adoption is received by the authority and shall end 12 weeks after that date.  Interest on the loan shall not accrue during the period of deferment. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.